Maine, session 132, LD372.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §1760, sub-§116 is enacted to read:
116. Gold and silver coins and bullion. Beginning January 1, 2026, sales of gold
and silver coins and bullion.
For the purposes of this subsection, "gold and silver coins and bullion" means coins, bars
or rounds minted primarily of refined gold or silver that are marked and valued by their
weight, purity and content and not on their form. "Bullion" does not include fabricated
gold or silver that has been processed or manufactured for industrial, professional or artistic
uses.